Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.178, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Project or portfolio assessment. (a) Prior to inclusion of a project or portfolio in the state transportation improvement program or in a metropolitan transportation improvement program, the applicable entity must perform an impact assessment of the project or portfolionew text begin and evaluate the project under, if applicable, both the state transportation improvement plan and the metropolitan transportation improvement plannew text end . Following the assessment, the applicable entity must determine if the project or portfolio is proportionally in conformancenew text begin , either under an individual program or in combination, where applicable,new text end with: (1) the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets under section 174.01, subdivision 3; and (2) the vehicle miles traveled reduction targets established in the statewide multimodal transportation plan under section 174.03, subdivision 1a. (b) If the applicable entity determines that the project or portfolio is not in conformance with paragraph (a), the applicable entity must: (1) alter the scope or design of the project or any number of projects, add or remove one or more projects from the portfolio, or undertake a combination, and subsequently perform a revised assessment that meets the requirements under this section; (2) interlink sufficient impact mitigation as provided in subdivision 4; or (3) halt project development and disallow inclusion of the project or portfolio in the appropriate transportation improvement program. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to projects assessed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.178, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Impact mitigation; interlinking. (a) To provide for impact mitigation, the applicable entity must interlink the project or portfolio as provided in this subdivision. (b) Impact mitigation is sufficient under subdivision 2, paragraph (b), if the project or portfolio is interlinked to offset actions such that the total greenhouse gas emissions reduction from the offset actions, after accounting for the greenhouse gas emissions otherwise resulting from the project or portfolio, is consistent with meeting the targets specified under subdivision 2, paragraph (a)new text begin , clause (1)new text end . Each comparison under this paragraph must be performed over equal comparison periods. (c) An offset action consists of a project, program, operations modification, or mitigation plan in one or more of the following areas: (1) transit expansion, including but not limited to regular route bus, arterial bus rapid transit, highway bus rapid transit, rail transit, and intercity passenger rail; (2) transit service improvements, including but not limited to increased service level, transit fare reduction, and transit priority treatments; (3) active transportation infrastructure; (4) micromobility infrastructure and service, including but not limited to shared vehicle services; (5) transportation demand management, including but not limited to vanpool and shared vehicle programs, remote work, and broadband access expansion; (6) parking management, including but not limited to parking requirements reduction or elimination and parking cost adjustments; (7) land use, including but not limited to residential and other density increases, mixed-use development, and transit-oriented development; (8) infrastructure improvements related to traffic operations, including but not limited to roundabouts and reduced conflict intersections; (9) natural systems, including but not limited to prairie restoration, reforestation, and urban green space; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) new text begin accelerated electric vehicle and other zero-emission vehicle adoption, including but not limited to electric vehicle infrastructure and zero-emission transit bus procurement under the requirements specified in law; andnew text end new text begin (11) new text end as specified by the commissioner in the manner provided under paragraph (e). (d) An offset action may be identified as interlinked to the project or portfolio if: (1) there is a specified project, program, modification, or mitigation plan; (2) the necessary funding sources are identified and sufficient amounts are committed; (3) the mitigation is localized as provided in subdivision 5; and (4) procedures are established to ensure that the mitigation action remains in substantially the same form or a revised form that continues to meet the calculation under paragraph (b). (e) The commissioner may authorize additional offset actions under paragraph (c) if: (1) the offset action is reviewed and recommended by the technical advisory committee under section 161.1782; and (2) the commissioner determines that the offset action is directly related to reduction in the transportation sector of greenhouse gas emissions or vehicle miles traveled. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to projects assessed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.178, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Public information. The commissioner must publish information regarding impact assessments on the department's website. The information must include: (1) for each project evaluated separately under this section, identification of the project; (2) for each project evaluated separately, a summary that includes an overview of the assessment, the impact determination by the commissioner, and project disposition, including a review of any offset actions; (3) for each portfolio of projects, an overview of the projects, the impact determination by the commissioner, and a summary of any offset actions; (4) a review of any interpretation of or additions to offset actions under subdivision 4; (5) identification of the date established by the commissioner under subdivision 2a, paragraph (b); deleted text begin anddeleted text end (6) new text begin identification of any exemptions provided under subdivision 7, paragraph (b); andnew text end new text begin (7) new text end a summary of the activities of the technical advisory committee under section 161.1782, including but not limited to any findings or recommendations made by the advisory committee. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to projects assessed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.178, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Safety and well-being. new text begin (a) new text end The requirements of this section are in addition to and must not supplant the safety and well-being goals established under section 174.01, subdivision 2, clauses (1) and (2). new text begin (b) The commissioner may exempt a project from the requirements under this section if the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) identifies a priority for urgent traffic safety response to traffic fatalities or serious injuries; and new text end new text begin (2) determines that the project reasonably addresses the traffic safety priority identified under clause (1). new text end new text begin (c) If the commissioner exempts a project under the conditions specified in paragraph (b), the reasons for the exemption must be submitted for review by the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation within 90 days of the commissioner's exemption. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to projects assessed on or after that date. new text end